Connecticut, session 2026, SB00431.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective from passage) (a) The Commissioner of Social
Services, in consultation with the Commissioner of Public Health, shall
study the need for palliative and hospice care services in Litchfield
County. In conducting the study, the commissioner shall take into
consideration any findings concerning the need for such services by the
Palliative Care Advisory Council established pursuant to section 19a-6o
of the general statutes.
(b) Not later than January 1, 2027, the Commissioner of Social
Services shall file a report on the study, in accordance with the
provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes, with the joint
standing committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to human services and public health. If the study
concludes that there is a need for such services, the commissioner may,
within available appropriations, design and implement a pilot program
to provide such services in Litchfield County. The commissioner shall
maximize any federal funding available for such pilot program and may
seek a Medicaid waiver or amend the Medicaid state plan to obtain such
funding.

Substitute Senate Bill No. 431
Governor's Action:
Approved June 2, 2026
Special Act No. 26-27 2 of 2